Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 11.1 Full Enforcement of Support Obligations

15-11.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Full Enforcement of Support Obligations Act”.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6.

15-11.1-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Administrator” means the tax administrator for the department of administration, division of taxation or his or her designee.

“Board” means any bureau, board, or commission or other licensor that is affiliated with or is a part of the department of business regulation, and any other state agency, municipality, or licensor that issues a license authorizing a person to engage in a recreational activity, in a business, occupation, profession, industry, or authorizes a person to operate a motor vehicle.

“Compliance with a court order of support” means that the support obligor has accrued no more than ninety (90) days worth of current support no more than ninety (90) days worth of periodic payments due pursuant to a written agreement with the department or as set forth in a court order and/or has obtained or maintained health insurance coverage if required by a court order of support.

“CSE system” means the Rhode Island family court/department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement system, which system maintains the official record of support orders and arrearages of all support orders entered upon it in accordance with applicable administrative orders issued by the Rhode Island family court.

“Court order of support” means any judgment or order for the support of dependent children now or subsequently recorded and maintained on the child support enforcement (CSE) system which has been issued by any court of the state or another state, including an order in a final decree of divorce or any judgment or order issued in accordance with an administrative procedure established by state law that affords substantial due process and is subject to judicial review.

“Department” means the department of administration, division of taxation.

“License” means any of the following: a license to operate a motor vehicle, a motor vehicle registration, a license, certification, registration, permit, approval, or other similar document evidencing admission to or granting authority to engage in a profession, occupation, business, industry, or recreational activity.

“Licensee” means any individual holding any of the following: a license to operate a motor vehicle, motor vehicle registration, a license, certification, registration, permit, approval, or other similar document evidencing admission to or granting authority to engage in a profession, occupation, business, industry, or recreational activity.

“Obligor” means any person required to make payments under the terms of a court order of support.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 5.

15-11.1-3.
Notice.

The department may serve notice upon a support obligor who is not in compliance with a court order of support that informs the obligor of the department’s intention to submit the obligor’s name to any appropriate board, state agency, or department as a licensee who is not in compliance with a court order of support.

The notice shall include the address and telephone number of the department’s support enforcement office that issues the notice and a statement of the need to obtain a release from that office as provided in §

15-11.1-7

. The department shall attach a copy or facsimile of the obligor’s court order of support to the notice. Service of the notice must be made by first class mail. The notice must inform the obligor that:

The obligor may request a family court hearing to contest the issue of compliance;

A request for a hearing must be made in writing and must be received by the department within thirty (30) days of the date of the notice;

If the obligor requests a hearing within thirty (30) days of the date of the notice, the department shall stay action to certify the obligor to any board for noncompliance with a court order of support pending a decision after a hearing;

If the obligor does not request a hearing within thirty (30) days of the date of the notice and is not in compliance with a court order of support, the department shall certify the obligor to the appropriate board, state agency, or department for noncompliance with a court order of support;

If the department certifies the obligor to a board for noncompliance with a court order of support, the board, state agency, or department shall suspend the obligor’s license and refuse to issue or reissue a license until the obligor provides the board with a release from the department that states the obligor is in compliance with the obligor’s support order. A suspension by an agency or a refusal by an agency to reissue, renew, or otherwise extend the license or certificate of authority shall be deemed a final determination;

If the obligor files a motion to modify support with the family court and duly serves the department with notice of the motion to modify, the department shall stay action to certify the obligor to any board for noncompliance with a court order of support; and

The obligor may restore compliance with a court order of support by:

Paying current support; and

Paying all past due support or, if unable to pay all past due support and a periodic payment for past due support has not been ordered by the court, by making periodic payments in accordance with a written payment agreement with the department which agreement shall then be filed with the family court; and/or

Meeting the obligor’s health insurance obligation.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 5.

15-11.1-4.
Family court compliance hearing.

An obligor may request a hearing before a magistrate of the family court upon receipt of service of the notice described in §

15-11.1-3

. The request for a hearing must be made in writing and must be received by the department within thirty (30) days of the date of the notice. The department shall promptly file the obligor’s written request for a hearing with the clerk of the family court or his or her designee; the clerk shall then assign the matter for a hearing before a magistrate of the family court.

The department shall notify the obligor in writing of the date, time, and place of the hearing assigned by the clerk. Service of the hearing notice must be made by first class mail.

The issues that may be determined at the hearing are limited to whether the obligor is required to pay child support under a court or administrative order and whether the obligor is in compliance with a court order of support.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the obligor from filing other appropriate motions for relief, including but not limited to a motion to modify a support order, with the family court.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 5; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 6.

15-11.1-5.
Automatic stay pending compliance hearing.

If an obligor requests a timely hearing to contest the issue of compliance in accordance with §

15-11.1-4

, the department may not certify the name of the obligor to a board for noncompliance with a court order of support until the department receives a decision or order of the family court that finds the obligor is not in compliance with a court order of support.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6.

15-11.1-6.
Certification of noncompliance.

The department may certify in writing to any appropriate board that a support obligor is not in compliance with a court order of support if:

The obligor does not timely request a hearing upon service of a notice issued under §

15-11.1-3

and is not in compliance with a court order of support thirty-one (31) days after service of the notice or mailing of the notice;

The family court issues a decision or order after a hearing that finds the obligor is not in compliance with a court order of support, and the obligor has not appealed the decision within any applicable appeal period provided by law for appeals of a decision or order of a magistrate of the family court; or

After a decision or order of the family court has been appealed, a decision or order of the Rhode Island supreme court which determines or affirms that the obligor is not in compliance with a court order of support.

The department’s certification shall include a copy of the decision or order of the court, where applicable. The department shall send by first class mail a copy of any certification of noncompliance filed with a board to the obligor at the obligor’s most recent address of record.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 5; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 6.

15-11.1-7.
Suspension by board — Notice from board.

Upon receipt of the certification of noncompliance from the department issued in accordance with §

15-11.1-6

, a board shall suspend the obligor’s license and refuse to issue or reissue a license until the obligor provides the board with a release from the department that states the obligor is in compliance with the obligor’s support order. When an obligor who is served notice under §

15-11.1-3

subsequently complies with the court order of support, the department shall within five (5) business days after compliance provide the obligor with written confirmation and a release that the obligor is in compliance with the order. A suspension by a board or a refusal by a board to reissue, renew, or otherwise extend the license or certificate of authority shall be deemed a final determination for the purposes of chapter 35 of title 42.

A board shall notify an obligor certified by the department under §

15-11.1-6

, without undue delay, that the obligor’s application for the issuance or renewal of a license may not be granted or that the obligor’s license has been suspended because the obligor’s name has been certified by the department as a support obligor who is not in compliance with a court order of support.

Within five (5) business days of receiving written confirmation that the obligor is in compliance with the court order of support, the board shall reinstate, reissue, renew or otherwise extend the obligor’s license or certificate of authority.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 5.

15-11.1-8.
Reporting.

During each renewal period all boards subject to this chapter shall provide to the department specified information, according to standards established by the department, about applicants for licensure and all current licensees.

All boards subject to this chapter shall provide the specified information for only those current licensees that are residents of this state.

The information to be provided must include all of the following information to the extent that this information is maintained by the board about the licensee:

Name;

Address of record;

Federal employer identification number or social security number;

Type of license;

Effective date of license or renewal;

Expiration date of license; and

Active or inactive status.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 24.

15-11.1-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 25, effective July 7, 2000.

15-11.1-10.
Rules and regulations.

The department of human services is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations that it deems necessary to implement the provisions and purposes of this chapter; provided, that any rule or regulation affecting the duties and responsibilities of the family court shall be made with the concurrence of the chief judge of the family court.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6.

15-11.1-11.
Cooperative agreements with boards.

The department and the various boards may enter into any agreements that may be necessary to carry out the requirements of this section, but only to the extent the department determines it is cost effective.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6.

15-11.1-12.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of it is for any reason judged invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the chapter, but shall be confined in its effect to the provision or application directly involved in the controversy giving rise to the judgment.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6.